Utah statutes.
19-3-110.   Criminal penalties.
(1)  Any person who knowingly violates any provision of Sections 19-3-104
through 19-3-113 or lawful orders or rules adopted by the department under
those sections shall in a criminal proceeding:
(a)  for the first violation, be guilty of a class B misdemeanor; and
(b)  for a subsequent similar violation within two years, be guilty of a third
degree felony.
(2)  In addition, a person is liable for any expense incurred by the
department in removing or abating any violation.
(3)  Conviction under Sections 19-3-104 through 19-3-113 does not relieve the
person convicted from civil liability for any act which was also a violation
of the public health laws.
